Hawaii statutes.
[§503B-10] Fees and administrative fines.
(a) The lieutenant governor shall charge and collect the following fees:

(1) Application for commissioner of deeds commission,
$10;

(2) Application for renewal of commissioner of deeds
commission, $10;

(3) Application for restoration of forfeited
commission, $10;

(4) Application for reinstatement of suspended
commission, $10;

(5) Issuance of the original commission, $40;

(6) Renewal of the commission, $40;

(7) Restoration of forfeited commission, $60;

(8) Reinstatement of suspended commission, $40; and

(9) Commission name change, $10.

Fees may be adjusted by the lieutenant governor
by adopting rules pursuant to chapter 91.

(b) The lieutenant governor may impose and
collect the following administrative fines if a commissioner of deeds fails to
do the following:

(1) Maintain an official seal in accordance with
section 503B-2(a)(1) and any rule adopted pursuant to chapter 91, $20;

(2) Surrender the seal and certificate of the
commissioner of deeds to the lieutenant governor within ninety days of
resignation, removal from office, or the expiration of a term without renewal,
$200;

(3) Authenticate every acknowledgment or jurat with a
certificate that is signed and dated by a commissioner and in a form prescribed
by the lieutenant governor, $500;

(4) Record all of the transactions of the
commissioner of deeds as prescribed by section 503B-4 and any rules adopted
pursuant to chapter 91, $200;

(5) Surrender the record books of the commissioner of
deeds to the lieutenant governor within ninety days of the expiration or
termination of the commission, resignation, or removal from office, $500;

(6) Notify the lieutenant governor within ten days
after loss, misplacement, or theft of the commissioner's seal or record book,
or both, $20; provided that, in the case of theft, the commissioner shall also:

(A) Inform the appropriate local law
enforcement agency of the theft within ten days of discovery of the theft or,
if the theft occurs on a vessel, inform the vessel's captain of the theft
within ten days of discovery of the theft;

(B) Use reasonable efforts to obtain a copy
of a report of the theft from the appropriate local law enforcement agency or,
if the theft occurs on a vessel, from the vessel's captain or other officer;
and

(C) Deliver a copy of any report of the theft
to the lieutenant governor within ten days after receipt thereof.

Administrative fines may be adjusted by the
lieutenant governor by adopting rules pursuant to chapter 91.

(c) Moneys collected by the lieutenant
governor pursuant to this section shall be deposited by the director of finance
to the credit of the general fund. [L 2016, c 78, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next